Louisiana, session 2026, SB476.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Arts. 2412 (A)(1) and 2413(B) and (C) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 2412. Method of service; delay for answering
A.(1) The sheriff shall serve upon the garnishee the citation and a copy of the
petition and of the interrogatories, together with a notice that a seizure is thereby
effected against any property of or indebtedness to the judgment debtor. The notice
shall include the following statement in boldface type: "The failure to file into
the court record within thirty days your sworn answer to these interrogatories
may cause you to be personally responsible for the entire amount owed by the
judgment debtor."
* * *
Art. 2413. Effect of garnishee's failure to answer
* * *
B.(1) Judgment shall be rendered against the garnishee on trial of the motion
unless he proves that he had no property of and was not indebted to the judgment
debtor. If on the trial of such motion, the garnishee proves the amount of such
property or indebtedness, the judgment against the garnishee shall be limited to the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 476 ENROLLED
delivery of the property or payment of the indebtedness, as provided in Article 2415.
(2) If the judgment was rendered pursuant to this Paragraph against the
garnishee as a result of his failure to appear after proper service, the garnishee
shall have thirty days from service of the judgment to move for a new trial.
(3) Any motion for a new trial pursuant to Subparagraph (2) of this
Paragraph shall be granted only if it includes an affidavit affirming the facts
that the garnishee is required to prove under Subparagraph (4) of this
Paragraph.
(4) At any new trial granted pursuant to this Paragraph, the garnishee
bears the burden of proof that he never had any property of and was never
indebted to the judgment debtor during the pendency of the garnishment
proceeding, or that he has satisfied the judgment to the full extent of the amount
of such property or indebtedness actually in his possession at any time after the
garnishment proceeding is commenced by service of the petition upon him.
C. Regardless of the decision on the contradictory motion, the court shall
render judgment against the garnishee for the costs and a reasonable attorney fee for
the motion. This shall include an award against the garnishee for the additional
costs and a reasonable attorney fee actually incurred by the judgment creditor
due to the fault of the garnishee in failing to initially respond.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.